Utah statutes.
32B-8-402.   Specific operational requirements for a sublicense.

(1)  A person operating under a sublicense is subject to the operational requirements under the provisions applicable to the sublicense except that:

(a)  notwithstanding a requirement in the provisions applicable to the sublicense, a person operating under the sublicense is not subject to a requirement that a certain percentage of the gross receipts for the sublicense be from the sale of food, except to the extent that the gross receipts for the sublicense are included in calculating the percentages under Subsection 32B-8-401(4); and

(b)  notwithstanding Section 32B-6-202 or 32B-6-302, a bar structure in a licensed premises operated under a full-service restaurant sublicense or limited-service restaurant sublicense is considered a grandfathered bar structure if the resort license that includes the full-service restaurant sublicense or limited-service restaurant sublicense is issued by no later than December 31, 2010.

(2)  Subject to Section 32B-8-502, for purposes of interpreting an operational requirement imposed by the provisions applicable to a sublicense:

(a)  a requirement imposed on a person operating under a sublicense applies to the resort licensee; and

(b)  a requirement imposed on staff of a person operating under a sublicense applies to staff of the resort licensee.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

